lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Vandens dozavimas ir filtravimas > Vandens filtravimo priedai: Vandens filtrų kasetės; Vandens filtrų korpusai
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > ウォーターサーバー・浄水器 > 浄水器関連用品: 浄水器カートリッジ; 浄水器ハウジング
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Filtración y distribución de agua > Accesorios para filtro de agua: Cartuchos de filtro de agua; Cajas de filtro de agua
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Дистрибуция и филтриране на вода > Аксесоари за филтриране на вода: Глави за филтри за вода; Корпуси за филтри за вода
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 급수/정수 > 정수 필터 부대용품: 정수 필터 카트리지; 정수 필터 하우징
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Točenje in filtriranje vode > Dodatki za filtriranje vode: Vložki za vodne filtre; Ohišja za vodne filtre
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Veden käyttöautomaatit ja suodatus > Vedensuodatustarvikkeet: Veden suodatuspatruunat; Vedensuodattimen kotelot
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Distribuição e filtragem de água > Acessórios de filtragem de água: Cartuchos de filtro de água; Alojamentos de filtro de água
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Distribuirea și filtrarea apei > Accesorii pentru filtrarea apei: Cartușe filtrante pentru apă; Carcase pentru filtre de apă
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Vanddispensere og filtrering > Vandfiltrering – tilbehør: Vandfilterbeholdere; Vandfilterhuse
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Dávkování a filtrace vody > Příslušenství k vodním filtrům: Patrony do vodních filtrů; Pouzdra na vodní filtry
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízadagolás és szűrés > Vízszűrési kiegészítők: Vízszűrő patronok; Vízszűrő házak
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Distribuição e filtragem de água > Acessórios para filtragem de água: Cartuchos para filtro de água; Suportes para filtro de água
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Waterdispensers en -filters > Waterfilteraccessoires: Waterfiltercartridges; Waterfilterbehuizingen
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Lọc và phân phối nước > Phụ kiện lọc nước: Lõi lọc nước; Bộ lọc nước
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Συσκευές διανομής & φιλτραρίσματος νερού > Αξεσουάρ φιλτραρίσματος νερού: Φυσίγγια φίλτρων νερού; Θήκες φίλτρων νερού
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Distribuzione/filtro acqua > Accessori per filtro acqua: Cartucce filtri acqua; Contenitori filtri acqua
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Su Dağıtım ve Arıtma Sistemleri > Su Arıtma Cihazı Aksesuarları: Su Arıtma Cihazı Kartuşları; Su Arıtma Cihazı Mahfazaları
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Vattenautomater och vattenfiltrering > Tillbehör till vattenfiltrering: Vattenfilterpatroner; Vattenfilterhus
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Trinkwasserspender & Filter > Zubehör für Wasserfilter: Wasserfilterkartuschen; Wasserfiltergehäuse
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Dystrybucja i filtrowanie wody > Akcesoria do filtrowania wody: Wkłady do filtrów wody; Obudowy do filtrów wody
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Water Dispensing & Filtration > Water Filtration Accessories: Water Filter Cartridges; Water Filter Housings
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Doziranje i filtriranje vode > Pribor za filtriranje vode: Ulošci filtra za vodu; Kućišta filtra za vodu
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Distribution et filtration de l’eau > Accessoires de filtration de l’eau: Cartouches pour filtres à eau; Boîtiers pour filtres à eau
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 饮水机与净水器 > 净水器配件: 净水器滤芯; 净水器外壳
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Vanndispensering og -filtrering > Tilbehør for vannfiltrering: Vannfiltreringspatroner; Vannfiltreringshus
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 用水配送和過濾 > 濾水配件: 淨水濾芯; 濾水瓶
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Фильтрация и подача воды > Аксессуары для фильтров воды: Картриджи фильтров для воды; Корпуса фильтров для воды
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Dávkovanie a filtrácia vody > Príslušenstvo na filtráciu vody: Zásobníky do vodného filtra; Kryty vodného filtra
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > การจ่ายและกรองน้ำ > อุปกรณ์กรองน้ำ: หลอดกรองน้ำ; ที่ติดตั้งตัวกรองน้ำ